Maine, session 132, LD236.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §8055, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1985, c. 506, Pt. A, §4, is further
amended to read:
3. Receipt of petition. Within 60 days after receipt of a petition, the agency shall
either notify the petitioner in writing of its denial, stating the reasons therefor, or initiate
appropriate rule-making proceedings. Whenever a petition to adopt or modify a rule is
submitted by 150 or more registered voters of the State, the agency shall initiate appropriate
rulemaking rule-making proceedings within 60 days after receipt of the petition. The
petition must be verified and certified in the same manner provided in Title 21‑A, section
354, subsection 7, prior to its presentation to the agency. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, a rule-making proceeding initiated under this section by an agency
based on a petition to adopt or modify a rule submitted by 150 or more registered voters of
the State must be conducted by the agency through major substantive rulemaking in
accordance with the requirements of subchapter 2-A.